Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2708
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 60-2701 to 60-2709 shall in any way limit the rights or remedies which are otherwise available to a consumer under any other law.

Laws 1983, LB 155, § 8.

Under this section, a theory of recovery under sections 60-2701 to 60-2709 may be brought together with other theories of recovery. Genetti v. Caterpillar, Inc., 261 Neb. 98, 621 N.W.2d 529 (2001).